Illinois, session 104th, HB4971.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 166 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/166 new)7    Sec. 166. Illinois Veterans' Legacy Day. April 9 of each 8year is designated as Illinois Veterans' Legacy Day, to be 9observed throughout the State as a day to recognize and honor 10the service and sacrifice of Illinois' military veterans with 11suitable activities designed to teach and preserve Illinois' 12military history and build social connections between 13Illinois' veterans population and school-aged youth, 14including, but not limited to, veterans' speaking engagements 15with students at local elementary, middle, and high schools, 16and volunteer activities for students in the maintenance and 17upkeep of outdoor war and veterans' memorials and monuments. 18    Section 10. The Department of Veterans Affairs Act is 19amended by adding Section 45 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 2805/45 new)21    Sec. 45. Statewide military history initiative.  HB4971- 2 -LRB104 17636 KTG 31067 b1    (a) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall develop and 2implement a statewide military history initiative aimed at 3preserving Illinois' war and veterans' memorials, monuments, 4plaques, and historic sites.5    The Illinois War and Veterans Memorials and Monuments Fund 6is created as a special fund in the State treasury to support 7the preservation and restoration of outdoor memorials, 8monuments, plaques, and historic sites located within the 9State that highlight the service and sacrifice of Illinois' 10military veterans. The Fund shall consist of any moneys 11appropriated to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the 12preservation of Illinois' military history and monuments as 13well as any gifts, private donations, or other resources made 14to the Department for the purposes of this subsection. Subject 15to appropriation, moneys in the Fund shall be expended to 16provide grants to local governments, historic societies, and 17veterans' organizations seeking to restore, repair, or 18maintain a war or veterans' memorial, monument, plaque, or 19historic site within their community. The Department of 20Veterans Affairs shall establish criteria on how to identify 21war and veterans' memorials, monuments, plaques, and historic 22sites that are in need of preservation or restoration or other 23forms of aid, and match them with grants and other sources of 24funding based on the scope of the preservation or restoration 25project and on the grant applicant's ability to carry out and 26complete the project.  HB4971- 3 -LRB104 17636 KTG 31067 b1    The Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement 2the military history initiative and grant program under this 3subsection.4    (b) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall create and 5maintain a digital archive of Illinois veterans' records, 6letters, and oral histories and make such materials readily 7accessible to the general public and local schools. The 8Department shall partner with State colleges and universities 9to collect and preserve personal documents, photos, and 10interviews with Illinois veterans who served in the armed 11forces of the United States during World War II or during any 12subsequent period of time of armed hostilities in which the 13United States was engaged, including present conflicts. 14    Section 15. The School Code is amended by adding Section 152-3.214 as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)17    Sec. 2-3.214. Teaching modules on Illinois' military 18history. The State Board of Education shall prepare and make 19available to all school boards teaching modules on Illinois' 20military history for public school students enrolled in grades 216 through 12. The State Board of Education shall seek input 22from veterans' groups when developing the teaching modules.